Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.110

Renewal of certificates.

The secretary shall establish the administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for renewal of certificates as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 72; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 509; 1991 c 3 s 212; 1987 c 412 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.